Utah statutes.
41-1a-804.   Garagemen, repair shops, and service stations -- Duty to report number violations.

A person owning, conducting, managing, or operating a service station, marina, marine dealership, public garage, paint shop, or repair shop for vehicles, vessels, or outboard motors shall immediately notify the local peace officers of any vehicle, vessel, or outboard motor that has any identification number that has apparently been altered, obliterated, or removed.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

